it: Tecnologia di allerta meteo: Compatibile EAS; Radio meteo Environment Canada; Radio meteo NOAA (NWR); Nessuna; Certificato Public Alert; SAME (codifica messaggio area specifica); Altro
zh-CN: 天气警报技术: EAS 兼容; 加拿大环境气象广播; NOAA 气象广播 (NWR); 无; 公共警报认证; SAME（特定区域信息编码）; 其他
sl-SI: Tehnologija vremenskih opozoril: Združljiv z EAS; Kanadski okoljski vremeski radio; NOAA vremenska radijska postaja (NWR); Brez; Certificirano javno opozorilo; SAME (kodiranje sporočil za določeno območje); Drugo
nb: Værvarslingsteknologi: EAS-kompatibel; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); Ingen; Public Alert-sertifisert; SAME (Specific Area Message Encoding); Annet
pl: Technologia alertów pogodowych: Kompatybilny z EAS; Radio pogodowe Environment Canada; Radio pogodowe NOAA (NWR); Brak; Certyfikat alertu publicznego; SAME (kodowanie wiadomości dla określonego obszaru); Inne
fi: Säähälytystekniikka: EAS-yhteensopiva; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); Ei mitään; Public Alert -sertifioitu; SAME (Specific Area Message Encoding); Muu
ja: 気象警報技術: EAS 対応; カナダ環境省気象ラジオ; NOAA 気象ラジオ（NWR）; なし; Public Alert 認証; SAME（特定地域メッセージエンコーディング）; その他
hu: Időjárási riasztástechnológia: EAS kompatibilis; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); Egyik sem; Nyilvános riasztás tanúsított; SAME (specifikus területi üzenet kódolás); Egyéb
en: Weather alert technology: EAS compatible; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); None; Public Alert certified; SAME (Specific Area Message Encoding); Other
sk-SK: Technológia meteorologických upozornení: Kompatibilný s EAS; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); Žiadny; Certifikovaný verejný poplach; SAME (kódovanie správ pre špecifickú oblasť); Iné
fr: Technologie d’alerte météo: Compatible EAS; Radio météo Environnement Canada; Radio météo NOAA (NWR); Aucune; Certifié alerte publique; SAME (codage de message de zone spécifique); Autre
cs: Technologie meteorologických výstrah: Kompatibilní s EAS; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); Žádný; Certifikováno pro veřejná varování; SAME (kódování zpráv pro konkrétní oblast); Jiné
nl: Weerwaarschuwing technologie: EAS compatibel; Environment Canada weerradio; NOAA weerradio (NWR); Geen; Publiek alarm gecertificeerd; SAME (specifieke gebiedsberichtcodering); Andere
el: Τεχνολογία ειδοποίησης καιρού: Συμβατό με EAS; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); Καμία; Πιστοποιημένο Public Alert; SAME (Specific Area Message Encoding); Άλλο
ro-RO: Tehnologie de alertă meteo: Compatibil EAS; Radio meteo Environment Canada; Radio meteo NOAA (NWR); Niciuna; Certificat pentru alertă publică; SAME (codare mesaj pentru zonă specifică); Altele
bg-BG: Технология за предупреждение за времето: Съвместим с EAS; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); Няма; Сертифициран за публични известия; SAME (кодиране на съобщения за специфична зона); Други
da: Vejrvarslingsteknologi: EAS-kompatibel; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); Ingen; Public Alert certificeret; SAME (Specific Area Message Encoding); Andet
de: Wetterwarntechnologie: EAS-kompatibel; Environment Canada Wetterradio; NOAA Wetterradio (NWR); Keine; Public Alert zertifiziert; SAME (Specific Area Message Encoding); Sonstiges
sv: Vädervarningsteknik: EAS-kompatibel; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); Inga; Public Alert-certifierad; SAME (Specific Area Message Encoding); Övrigt
ru: Технология оповещений о погоде: Совместимый с EAS; Погодное радио Канады; Погодное радио NOAA (NWR); Нет; Сертифицированный для публичных оповещений; SAME (кодирование сообщений для конкретной области); Другой
hr-HR: Tehnologija upozorenja o vremenu: EAS kompatibilno; Environment Canada Weather Radio; NOAA Weather Radio (NWR); Nema; Certificirano za javne uzbune; SAME (kodiranje poruka za specifično područje); Ostalo
ko: 날씨 경보 기술: EAS 호환; Environment Canada 기상 라디오; NOAA 기상 라디오 (NWR); 없음; Public Alert 인증; SAME (특정 지역 메시지 인코딩); 기타
lt-LT: Orų įspėjimo technologija: Suderinamas su EAS; Kanados aplinkos orų radijas; NOAA orų radijas (NWR); Nėra; Viešųjų įspėjimų sertifikuotas; SAME (konkrečios srities pranešimų kodavimas); Kita
pt-PT: Tecnologia de alerta meteorológico: Compatível com EAS; Rádio meteorológico do Environment Canada; Rádio meteorológico NOAA (NWR); Nenhum; Certificado para alerta público; SAME (codificação de mensagem de área específica); Outro
zh-TW: 天氣警報技術: EAS 相容; 加拿大環境部氣象廣播; NOAA 氣象廣播（NWR）; 無; 公共警報認證; SAME（特定區域訊息編碼）; 其他
vi: Công nghệ cảnh báo thời tiết: Tương thích EAS; Radio thời tiết Canada; Radio thời tiết NOAA (NWR); Không có; Chứng nhận cảnh báo công cộng; SAME (Mã hóa thông điệp khu vực cụ thể); Khác
tr: Hava durumu uyarı teknolojisi: EAS uyumlu; Environment Canada hava radyosu; NOAA hava radyosu (NWR); Hiçbiri; Kamusal uyarı sertifikalı; SAME (Belirli alan mesaj kodlaması); Diğer
pt-BR: Tecnologia de alerta meteorológico: Compatível com EAS; Rádio meteorológico do Environment Canada; Rádio meteorológico NOAA (NWR); Nenhum; Certificado para alerta público; SAME (codificação de mensagem de área específica); Outro
es: Tecnología de alerta meteorológica: Compatible con EAS; Radio meteorológica de Environment Canada; Radio meteorológica NOAA (NWR); Ninguno; Certificado de alerta pública; SAME (codificación de mensajes de área específica); Otros
th: เทคโนโลยีเตือนภัยสภาพอากาศ: รองรับ EAS; วิทยุสภาพอากาศแคนาดา; วิทยุสภาพอากาศ NOAA (NWR); ไม่มี; ได้รับการรับรองเตือนภัยสาธารณะ; SAME (การเข้ารหัสข้อความพื้นที่เฉพาะ); อื่นๆ